District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.08

Conduct of meeting.

(a)

At each meeting of members, an individual shall preside as chair. The chair shall be appointed:

(1)

As provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws;

(2)

In the absence of a provision in the articles or bylaws, by the board of directors; or

(3)

In the absence of both a provision in the articles or bylaws and an appointment by the board, by the members at the meeting.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the chair shall determine the order of business and has the authority to establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

(c)

Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to the members.

(d)

The chair of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no ballots, proxies, or votes, or any otherwise permissible revocations or changes thereto, shall be accepted.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-401.50.